Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4724
Commission; meetings; record; quorum.

The commission shall hold at least four meetings a year, at a time and place decided by the commission, and shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be open to the public for inspection. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the holding of special meetings. Written notice of the time and place of all meetings shall be mailed in advance to the office of each member of the commission by the secretary. Six members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 250, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 15.